South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4717.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 19, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-19-35. The State is divided into seven congressional districts as follows: District 1 Area Population County: Beaufort SC 187,117 County: Berkeley SC 229,861 County: Charleston SC VTD: Awendaw 1,621 VTD: Christ Church 1,164 VTD: Edisto Island 1,884 VTD: Folly Beach 1 920 VTD: Folly Beach 2 1,196 VTD: Isle Of Palms 1A 1,120 VTD: Isle of Palms 1B 1,524 VTD: Isle of Palms 1C 1,758 VTD: James Island 10 2,195 VTD: James Island 11 2,559 VTD: James Island 12 1,661 VTD: James Island 13 2,088 VTD: James Island 14 1,129 VTD: James Island 15 2,166 VTD: James Island 17 2,355 VTD: James Island 19 2,233 VTD: James Island 1A 2,687 VTD: James Island 1B 1,408 VTD: James Island 2 7,318 VTD: James Island 20 1,976 VTD: James Island 22 1,920 VTD: James Island 3 1,069 VTD: James Island 5A 1,875 VTD: James Island 5B 1,108 VTD: James Island 6 2,102 VTD: James Island 7 2,684 VTD: James Island 8A 1,842 VTD: James Island 8B 2,568 VTD: James Island 9 1,837 VTD: Johns Island 1A 2,742 VTD: Johns Island 1B 3,313 VTD: Johns Island 3A 5,443 VTD: Johns Island 3B 2,184 VTD: Johns Island 4 1,860 VTD: Kiawah Island 2,012 VTD: McClellanville 1,975 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 1 1,904 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 10 1,358 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 11 1,903 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 12 3,436 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 13 1,630 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 14 2,113 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 15 2,919 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 16 948 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 17 3,786 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 18 1,528 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 19 2,968 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 2 1,564 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 20 1,715 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 21 2,194 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 22 2,266 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 23 2,724 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 24 1,040 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 25 1,402 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 26 734 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 27 4,062 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 28 1,560 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 29 385 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 3 1,914 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 30 2,607 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 31 2,093 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 32 3,609 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 33 5,428 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 34 2,358 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 35 7,539 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 36 2,481 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 37 4,732 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 38 2,331 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 39 5,875 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 4 2,032 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 5 1,644 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 6 2,648 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 7 1,353 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 8 1,193 VTD: Mt. Pleasant 9 1,354 VTD: Sullivans Island 1,891 VTD: Town of Seabrook 2,178 VTD: Wadmalaw Island 1 1,406 VTD: Wadmalaw Island 2 1,442 County Charleston SC Subtotal 179,743 County: Colleton SC VTD: Edisto Beach 1,253 VTD: Green Pond 1,105 County Colleton SC Subtotal 2,358 County: Dorchester SC VTD: Ashborough East 2,166 VTD: Ashborough East 2 1,045 VTD: Ashborough West 924 VTD: Ashborough West 2 1,538 VTD: Bacons Bridge 3,470 VTD: Bacons Bridge 2 1,332 VTD: Beech Hill 1,657 VTD: Beech Hill 2 Block: 450350108014000 1,050 Block: 450350108014001 40 Block: 450350108014002 130 Block: 450350108014003 149 Block: 450350108014004 61 Block: 450350108014008 69 Block: 450350108014009 455 Block: 450350108014010 70 Block: 450350108014012 64 Block: 450350108014013 77 Block: 450350108014014 26 VTD Beech Hill 2 Subtotal 2,191 VTD: Brandymill 993 VTD: Brandymill 2 1,956 VTD: Briarwood 2,153 VTD: Briarwood 2 1,522 VTD: Briarwood 3 1,008 VTD: Butternut 2,971 VTD: Carolina 2,965 VTD: Central 2,206 VTD: Central 2 2,486 VTD: Clemson 2,367 VTD: Clemson 2 4,253 VTD: Clemson 3 2,849 VTD: Coastal 2,082 VTD: Coastal 2 2,266 VTD: Coastal 3 1,179 VTD: Coosaw 4,919 VTD: Coosaw 2 3,371 VTD: Coosaw 3 2,322 VTD: Cypress Block: 450350105011003 453 Block: 450350105011004 155 Block: 450350105011005 374 Block: 450350105011006 129 Block: 450350105011007 47 Block: 450350105011017 234 Block: 450350105012007 1,741 Block: 450350105012008 102 Block: 450350105012009 128 Block: 450350105012010 91 Block: 450350105012011 131 Block: 450350105012012 117 Block: 450350105012013 99 Block: 450350105013000 14 Block: 450350105013001 146 Block: 450350105013002 0 Block: 450350105013003 293 Block: 450350105013004 16 Block: 450350105013008 31 Block: 450350105013010 18 Block: 450350105013011 178 Block: 450350105013012 126 Block: 450350105013013 36 VTD Cypress Subtotal 4,659 VTD: Cypress 2 1,273 VTD: Delemars Block: 450350108011001 10 Block: 450350108011002 0 Block: 450350108011003 0 Block: 450350108011004 45 Block: 450350108011005 31 Block: 450350108011006 53 Block: 450350108011007 26 Block: 450350108011008 75 Block: 450350108011010 40 Block: 450350108011011 0 Block: 450350108011012 0 Block: 450350108011013 59 Block: 450350108011014 0 Block: 450350108011015 44 Block: 450350108011016 33 VTD Delemars Subtotal 416 VTD: Dorchester 1,644 VTD: Dorchester 2 1,166 VTD: Flowertown 3,521 VTD: Flowertown 2 2,389 VTD: Flowertown 3 2,321 VTD: Germantown 2,026 VTD: Givhans Block: 450350104003000 130 Block: 450350104003001 112 Block: 450350104003002 36 Block: 450350104003003 233 Block: 450350104003004 32 Block: 450350104003005 25 Block: 450350104003006 9 Block: 450350104003007 14 Block: 450350104003008 149 Block: 450350104003009 45 Block: 450350104003011 69 Block: 450350104003012 93 Block: 450350104003013 15 Block: 450350104003014 16 Block: 450350104003015 38 Block: 450350104003017 8 Block: 450350104003029 107 Block: 450350104003030 110 Block: 450350104003031 20 Block: 450350104003034 19 VTD Givhans Subtotal 1,280 VTD: Givhans 2 Block: 450350104004000 13 Block: 450350104004001 231 Block: 450350104004002 42 Block: 450350104004003 62 Block: 450350104004004 155 Block: 450350104004005 25 Block: 450350104004009 148 Block: 450350104004010 308 Block: 450350104004011 178 Block: 450350104004012 21 Block: 450350104004013 36 Block: 450350104004014 0 Block: 450350104004015 43 Block: 450350104004016 26 Block: 450350104004017 7 Block: 450350104004018 19 Block: 450350104004019 29 Block: 450350104004020 8 Block: 450350104004021 46 Block: 450350104004022 18 Block: 450350104004023 14 Block: 450350104004024 0 Block: 450350104004025 117 Block: 450350104004026 12 Block: 450350104004027 0 Block: 450350104004028 0 Block: 450350104004029 0 Block: 450350104004032 7 VTD Givhans 2 Subtotal 1,565 VTD: Greenhurst 1,875 VTD: Greenwave 2,208 VTD: Irongate 881 VTD: Irongate 2 836 VTD: Irongate 3 880 VTD: King's Grant 2,190 VTD: King's Grant 2 2,819 VTD: Knightsville 2,214 VTD: Lincoln Block: 450350108182010 153 Block: 450350108182011 43 Block: 450350108182012 119 Block: 450350108182013 103 VTD Lincoln Subtotal 418 VTD: Miles/Jamison 2,931 VTD: Newington 1,417 VTD: Newington 2 961 VTD: North Summerville 620 VTD: North Summerville 2 1,964 VTD: Oakbrook 6,235 VTD: Oakbrook 2 2,002 VTD: Sawmill Branch 2,109 VTD: Spann 1,788 VTD: Stallsville 1,429 VTD: Tranquil 1,339 VTD: Tranquil 2 2,264 VTD: Tranquil 3 2,136 VTD: Trolley 2,522 VTD: Tupperway 1,344 VTD: Tupperway 2 1,657 VTD: Windsor Block: 450350108182003 53 VTD Windsor Subtotal 53 County Dorchester SC Subtotal 127,543 County: Jasper SC VTD: OAKATIE 2 1,893 VTD: SUN CITY 2,688 County Jasper SC Subtotal 4,581 District 1 Total 731,203 District 2 Area Population County: Greenville SC VTD: BAKER CREEK 2,435 VTD: DUNKLIN 3,829 VTD: FORK SHOALS 3,047 VTD: FOUNTAIN INN 1 5,157 VTD: FOUNTAIN INN 2 2,728 VTD: LONG CREEK 2,484 VTD: NEELY FARMS 4,822 VTD: PIEDMONT Block: 450450033012011 82 Block: 450450033012012 44 Block: 450450033012013 73 Block: 450450033012014 56 Block: 450450033012015 15 Block: 450450033012016 10 Block: 450450033012017 6 Block: 450450033012018 62 Block: 450450033012019 67 Block: 450450033012020 248 Block: 450450033012021 6 Block: 450450033012022 20 Block: 450450033012023 49 Block: 450450033012024 33 Block: 450450033012025 15 Block: 450450033012026 22 Block: 450450033012027 46 Block: 450450033012028 10 Block: 450450033012031 0 Block: 450450033012032 0 Block: 450450033012036 99 Block: 450450033012037 0 Block: 450450033012038 13 Block: 450450033012049 33 Block: 450450033013021 59 Block: 450450033013022 394 Block: 450450033013023 47 Block: 450450033013024 49 Block: 450450033013026 30 Block: 450450033013027 35 VTD PIEDMONT Subtotal 1,623 VTD: PINEVIEW 1,985 VTD: RAINTREE 5,224 VTD: REEDY FORK 4,524 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 1 4,067 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 2 3,107 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 3 3,685 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 4 3,140 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 5 3,783 VTD: SIMPSONVILLE 6 3,936 VTD: SYCAMORE 4,357 VTD: VERDMONT 3,123 VTD: WARE PLACE 3,160 County Greenville SC Subtotal 70,216 County: Greenwood SC 69,351 County: Laurens SC 67,539 County: Lexington SC VTD: BARR ROAD 1 1,987 VTD: BARR ROAD 2 5,274 VTD: BATESBURG 3,002 VTD: BEULAH CHURCH 3,318 VTD: BOILING SPRINGS 3,727 VTD: BOILING SPRINGS SOUTH 2,300 VTD: Carolina Springs 3,348 VTD: CAYCE 2A 2,176 VTD: CAYCE NO. 1 2,866 VTD: CAYCE NO. 2 2,839 VTD: CAYCE NO. 3 1,041 VTD: CEDARCREST 2,743 VTD: CHALK HILL 5,361 VTD: CONGAREE 1 3,187 VTD: CONGAREE 2 1,720 VTD: CROMER 2,172 VTD: EDENWOOD 3,352 VTD: EDMUND 1 2,575 VTD: EDMUND 2 3,266 VTD: EMMANUEL CHURCH 3,261 VTD: FAIRVIEW 2,329 VTD: FAITH CHURCH 2,732 VTD: GASTON 1 2,574 VTD: GASTON 2 3,512 VTD: GILBERT 3,311 VTD: HOLLOW CREEK 3,790 VTD: HOOK'S STORE 3,746 VTD: KITTI WAKE 2,646 VTD: LAKE MURRAY 1 3,078 VTD: LAKE MURRAY 2 5,407 VTD: LEAPHART ROAD 2,916 VTD: LEESVILLE 3,412 VTD: LEXINGTON NO. 1 4,224 VTD: LEXINGTON NO. 2 2,995 VTD: LEXINGTON NO. 3 4,896 VTD: LEXINGTON NO. 4 5,186 VTD: MACK-EDISTO 1,323 VTD: MIDWAY 1,904 VTD: MIMS 2,387 VTD: MOUNT HOREB 3,132 VTD: MT. HEBRON 2,040 VTD: OAKWOOD 4,509 VTD: OLD BARNWELL ROAD 3,267 VTD: PARK ROAD 1 3,091 VTD: PARK ROAD 2 1,852 VTD: PELION 1 2,527 VTD: PELION 2 2,508 VTD: PILGRIM CHRUCH 4,006 VTD: PINE RIDGE 1 1,876 VTD: PINE RIDGE 2 3,753 VTD: PINEVIEW 2,909 VTD: Platt Springs 1 2,044 VTD: Platt Springs 2 5,471 VTD: POND BRANCH 3,645 VTD: PROVIDENCE CHURCH 3,212 VTD: QUAIL HOLLOW 3,015 VTD: RED BANK 6,015 VTD: RED BANK SOUTH 1 3,973 VTD: RED BANK SOUTH 2 2,756 VTD: RIDGE ROAD 2,856 VTD: RIVER BLUFF 4,281 VTD: ROUND HILL 6,417 VTD: SALUDA RIVER 3,061 VTD: SAND HILL 3,638 VTD: SANDY RUN 1,437 VTD: SHARPE'S HILL 3,806 VTD: SPRINGDALE 2,813 VTD: SPRINGDALE SOUTH 1,069 VTD: ST. DAVIDS 3,939 VTD: SUMMIT 2,284 VTD: SWANSEA 1 1,997 VTD: SWANSEA 2 2,666 VTD: WEST COLUMBIA NO. 1 1,929 VTD: WEST COLUMBIA NO. 2 1,650 VTD: WEST COLUMBIA NO. 3 1,034 VTD: WEST COLUMBIA NO. 4 2,838 VTD: WESTOVER 2,086 VTD: WHITE KNOLL 4,115 County Lexington SC Subtotal 241,400 County: Newberry SC 37,719 County: Richland SC VTD: Arcadia 2,200 VTD: Ardincaple 944 VTD: Bluff 3,208 VTD: Brandon 1 3,590 VTD: Brandon 2 3,750 VTD: Briarwood 4,389 VTD: Caughman Road 2,657 VTD: Cooper 1,436 VTD: Dentsville Block: 450790108041020 1 Block: 450790108041021 0 Block: 450790108041029 0 Block: 450790108041030 9 Block: 450790108041031 0 VTD Dentsville Subtotal 10 VTD: East Forest Acres 1,545 VTD: Eastover 1,502 VTD: Edgewood 2,771 VTD: Gadsden 1,606 VTD: Garners 1,378 VTD: Gregg Park 3,319 VTD: Hampton 2,831 VTD: Hopkins 1 1,825 VTD: Hopkins 2 2,151 VTD: Horrell Hill 3,759 VTD: Hunting Creek 693 VTD: Keenan 2,553 VTD: Lykesland 2,531 VTD: Mallet Hill 4,292 VTD: McEntire 1,070 VTD: Meadowfield 2,326 VTD: Midway 4,819 VTD: Mill Creek 2,127 VTD: North Forest Acres 1,968 VTD: North Springs 1 Block: 450790114182014 30 Block: 450790114182017 23 VTD North Springs 1 Subtotal 53 VTD: North Springs 2 4,509 VTD: North Springs 3 2,863 VTD: Oakwood 1,335 VTD: Olympia 6,111 VTD: Pennington 1 1,292 VTD: Pennington 2 2,115 VTD: Pine Lakes 1 1,810 VTD: Pine Lakes 2 2,522 VTD: Pinewood 3,022 VTD: Polo Road 5,320 VTD: Pontiac 1 4,592 VTD: Ridgewood 987 VTD: Riverside 2,275 VTD: Satchelford 2,010 VTD: Skyland 1,964 VTD: South Beltline 2,584 VTD: South Forest Acres 1,995 VTD: Spring Valley 3,870 VTD: St. Andrews 2,109 VTD: Trenholm Road 1,467 VTD: Trinity 2,530 VTD: Valhalla 3,719 VTD: Ward 1 6,183 VTD: Ward 10 1,991 VTD: Ward 11 2,190 VTD: Ward 12 2,039 VTD: Ward 13 2,788 VTD: Ward 14 2,026 VTD: Ward 15 1,271 VTD: Ward 16 1,642 VTD: Ward 17 2,113 VTD: Ward 18 2,026 VTD: Ward 19 2,163 VTD: Ward 2 2,394 VTD: Ward 20 2,383 VTD: Ward 21 Block: 450790001001003 97 Block: 450790001001005 376 Block: 450790001001006 0 Block: 450790001001007 0 Block: 450790001001008 161 Block: 450790001001009 42 Block: 450790001001010 36 Block: 450790001001011 36 Block: 450790001001012 41 Block: 450790001001016 25 Block: 450790001001017 40 Block: 450790001001018 65 Block: 450790001001019 25 Block: 450790001001020 48 Block: 450790001001022 25 Block: 450790001001023 30 Block: 450790001001024 18 Block: 450790001001025 51 Block: 450790001001026 11 Block: 450790001001027 8 Block: 450790001001028 25 Block: 450790001001029 25 Block: 450790001001030 32 Block: 450790001001031 19 Block: 450790001001032 28 Block: 450790001001033 39 Block: 450790001001040 33 Block: 450790001001041 28 Block: 450790001001042 16 Block: 450790001002003 0 Block: 450790001002004 8 Block: 450790109001002 0 Block: 450790109001003 0 Block: 450790109001004 0 Block: 450790109001005 0 Block: 450790109001006 5 Block: 450790109001007 2 Block: 450790109001008 443 Block: 450790109001009 26 Block: 450790109001010 51 Block: 450790109001011 0 Block: 450790109001012 0 Block: 450790109001013 81 Block: 450790109001014 39 Block: 450790109001015 100 Block: 450790109001016 0 Block: 450790109001017 0 Block: 450790109001018 17 Block: 450790109001019 12 Block: 450790109001020 0 Block: 450790109001021 3 Block: 450790109001022 5 Block: 450790109001023 18 Block: 450790109001024 0 Block: 450790109001025 0 Block: 450790109001027 0 Block: 450790109001039 2 Block: 450790109001043 34 Block: 450790109001044 31 Block: 450790109001045 28 Block: 450790109001046 6 Block: 450790109001049 6 Block: 450790109001050 20 Block: 450790110001000 9 Block: 450790110001001 10 Block: 450790110001002 0 Block: 450790110001003 0 VTD Ward 21 Subtotal 2,336 VTD: Ward 22 2,175 VTD: Ward 23 1,308 VTD: Ward 24 1,365 VTD: Ward 25 2,579 VTD: Ward 26 10,666 VTD: Ward 29 2,030 VTD: Ward 3 2,011 VTD: Ward 30 2,342 VTD: Ward 31 1,728 VTD: Ward 32 1,205 VTD: Ward 33 1,388 VTD: Ward 34 1,476 VTD: Ward 4 1,969 VTD: Ward 5 8,651 VTD: Ward 6 1,834 VTD: Ward 7 1,809 VTD: Ward 8 1,591 VTD: Ward 9 1,379 VTD: Webber 1,598 VTD: Westminster 3,214 VTD: Wildewood 3,982 VTD: Woodfield 5,058 VTD: Woodlands 2,909 County Richland SC Subtotal 226,116 County: Saluda SC 18,862 District 2 Total 731,203 District 3 Area Population County: Abbeville SC 24,295 County: Aiken SC 168,808 County: Allendale SC 8,039 County: Anderson SC 203,718 County: Bamberg SC 13,311 County: Barnwell SC 20,589 County: Calhoun SC 14,119 County: Edgefield SC 25,657 County: Hampton SC 18,561 County: Jasper SC VTD: COOSAWHATCHIE 599 VTD: GILLISONVILLE 816 VTD: GRAHAMVILLE 1 1,675 VTD: GRAHAMVILLE 2 4,213 VTD: GRAYS 943 VTD: HARDEEVILLE 1 2,211 VTD: HARDEEVILLE 2 1,668 VTD: HARDEEVILLE 3 941 VTD: LEVY 3,059 VTD: OAKATIE 1,178 VTD: PINELAND 966 VTD: RIDGELAND 1 1,593 VTD: RIDGELAND 2 1,993 VTD: RIDGELAND 3 1,348 VTD: TILLMAN 1,007 County Jasper SC Subtotal 24,210 County: McCormick SC 9,526 County: Oconee SC 78,607 County: Orangeburg SC VTD: Bethel 895 VTD: Bolentown 1,973 VTD: Bowman 1 1,720 VTD: Bowman 2 1,038 VTD: Branchville 1 1,425 VTD: Branchville 2 680 VTD: Brookdale 1,673 VTD: Cope 904 VTD: Cordova 1 2,071 VTD: Cordova 2 2,622 VTD: Edisto 1,541 VTD: Four Holes 753 VTD: Jamison 2,405 VTD: Limestone 1 2,616 VTD: Limestone 2 2,430 VTD: Neeses-Livingston 1,757 VTD: Nix 1,579 VTD: North 1 1,789 VTD: North 2 1,769 VTD: Norway 1,671 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 1 1,035 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 10 1,018 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 2 988 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 3 2,075 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 4 2,768 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 5 1,022 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 6 1,095 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 7 958 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 8 1,022 VTD: Orangeburg Ward 9 805 VTD: Pine Hill 1,650 VTD: Rowesville 758 VTD: Springfield 1,601 VTD: Suburban 1 1,296 VTD: Suburban 2 748 VTD: Suburban 3 2,035 VTD: Suburban 4 769 VTD: Suburban 5 1,805 VTD: Suburban 6 1,308 VTD: Suburban 7 2,517 VTD: Suburban 8 1,169 VTD: Suburban 9 2,460 VTD: Whittaker 1,613 County Orangeburg SC Subtotal 65,826 County: Pickens SC VTD: Abel 2,291 VTD: Albert R. Lewis 1,940 VTD: Calhoun 3,546 VTD: Clemson 2,784 VTD: Flat Rock Block: 450770110031008 127 Block: 450770110032014 5 Block: 450770110032015 90 Block: 450770110032016 66 Block: 450770110032017 0 Block: 450770110032019 0 Block: 450770110032021 1 Block: 450770110032022 0 Block: 450770110032028 27 Block: 450770110032029 14 Block: 450770110032030 16 Block: 450770110032031 20 Block: 450770110032032 67 Block: 450770110032033 1 Block: 450770110032034 80 Block: 450770110032035 53 Block: 450770110032036 110 Block: 450770110032037 45 Block: 450770110032038 55 Block: 450770110032039 66 Block: 450770110032040 0 Block: 450770110032041 11 Block: 450770110032043 0 Block: 450770110032044 0 Block: 450770110032045 5 Block: 450770110032046 19 Block: 450770110041042 0 Block: 450770110041043 9 Block: 450770110043031 13 Block: 450770110043032 46 Block: 450770110043033 33 Block: 450770110043034 0 Block: 450770110043035 0 Block: 450770110043036 0 Block: 450770110043037 110 Block: 450770110043038 100 Block: 450770110043039 33 Block: 450770110043040 33 Block: 450770110043041 0 Block: 450770110043042 10 Block: 450770110043043 6 Block: 450770110043044 16 Block: 450770110043045 0 Block: 450770110052038 3 VTD Flat Rock Subtotal 1,290 VTD: Issaqueena 1,625 VTD: Lawrence Chapel 1,668 VTD: Morrison 5,468 VTD: Mountain View 2,161 VTD: Norris 1,851 VTD: North Central 1,938 VTD: Pike 1,598 VTD: Praters Creek 1,391 VTD: Rices Creek 2,051 VTD: Six Mile 2,330 VTD: Six Mile Mountain 2,243 VTD: South Central 2,426 VTD: Stone Church 2,016 VTD: University 7,248 VTD: West Central 3,616 VTD: West Liberty 2,192 VTD: West Pickens 2,264 County Pickens SC Subtotal 55,937 District 3 Total 731,203 District 4 Area Population County: Greenville SC VTD: AIKEN 2,882 VTD: ALTAMONT FOREST 1,693 VTD: ASHETON LAKES 4,068 VTD: AVON 2,641 VTD: BELLE MEADE 2,797 VTD: BELLS CROSSING 4,279 VTD: BELMONT 1,623 VTD: BEREA 3,443 VTD: BOILING SPRINGS 2,750 VTD: BOTANY WOODS 2,739 VTD: BRIDGE FORK 2,014 VTD: BROOKGLENN 1,788 VTD: CANEBRAKE 3,597 VTD: CAROLINA 2,657 VTD: CASTLE ROCK 4,104 VTD: CHESTNUT HILLS 3,090 VTD: CIRCLE CREEK 4,410 VTD: CLEAR CREEK 2,355 VTD: CONESTEE 3,467 VTD: DARBY RIDGE 3,930 VTD: DEL NORTE 3,455 VTD: DEVENGER 2,313 VTD: DONALDSON 2,250 VTD: DOVE TREE 2,632 VTD: EASTSIDE 3,795 VTD: EBENEZER 3,543 VTD: EDWARDS FOREST 3,234 VTD: ENOREE 4,688 VTD: FEASTER 2,321 VTD: FOX CHASE 2,680 VTD: FROHAWK 2,213 VTD: FURMAN 5,893 VTD: GOWENSVILLE 2,810 VTD: GRANITE CREEK 4,167 VTD: GRAZE BRANCH 2,277 VTD: GREENBRIAR 2,388 VTD: GREENVILLE 1 2,198 VTD: GREENVILLE 10 4,258 VTD: GREENVILLE 14 2,879 VTD: GREENVILLE 16 2,502 VTD: GREENVILLE 17 2,107 VTD: GREENVILLE 18 2,136 VTD: GREENVILLE 19 3,488 VTD: GREENVILLE 20 1,610 VTD: GREENVILLE 21 1,793 VTD: GREENVILLE 22 3,046 VTD: GREENVILLE 23 2,783 VTD: GREENVILLE 24 7,307 VTD: GREENVILLE 25 3,400 VTD: GREENVILLE 26 3,075 VTD: GREENVILLE 27 2,999 VTD: GREENVILLE 28 1,588 VTD: GREENVILLE 29 3,740 VTD: GREENVILLE 3 3,338 VTD: GREENVILLE 4 4,465 VTD: GREENVILLE 5 3,722 VTD: GREENVILLE 6 1,326 VTD: GREENVILLE 7 4,509 VTD: GREENVILLE 8 4,567 VTD: GROVE 3,512 VTD: HILLCREST 3,560 VTD: HOLLY TREE 1,813 VTD: JENNINGS MILL 2,193 VTD: KILGORE FARMS 4,034 VTD: LAKEVIEW 5,479 VTD: LAUREL RIDGE 3,436 VTD: LEAWOOD 3,942 VTD: LOCUST HILL 2,122 VTD: MAPLE CREEK 4,336 VTD: MARIDELL 2,888 VTD: MAULDIN 1 2,970 VTD: MAULDIN 2 6,409 VTD: MAULDIN 3 3,409 VTD: MAULDIN 4 4,642 VTD: MAULDIN 5 4,817 VTD: MAULDIN 6 2,930 VTD: MAULDIN 7 2,654 VTD: MISSION 3,421 VTD: MONAVIEW 5,928 VTD: MOORE CREEK 5,570 VTD: MOUNTAIN CREEK 2,803 VTD: MOUNTAIN VIEW 3,378 VTD: MT. PLEASANT 4,058 VTD: NORTHWOOD 2,740 VTD: OAKVIEW 3,861 VTD: ONEAL 4,570 VTD: PALMETTO 2,924 VTD: PARIS MOUNTAIN 1,705 VTD: PEBBLE CREEK 2,799 VTD: PELHAM FALLS 1,570 VTD: PIEDMONT Block: 450450033012000 47 Block: 450450033012001 33 Block: 450450033012002 0 Block: 450450033012003 36 Block: 450450033012004 11 Block: 450450033012005 9 Block: 450450033012006 31 Block: 450450033012007 15 Block: 450450033012008 0 Block: 450450033012009 17 Block: 450450033012010 9 Block: 450450033012029 51 Block: 450450033012030 18 Block: 450450033012033 48 Block: 450450033012034 27 Block: 450450033012035 39 Block: 450450033012048 0 Block: 450450033013000 110 Block: 450450033013001 81 Block: 450450033013002 34 Block: 450450033013003 18 Block: 450450033013004 564 Block: 450450033013005 62 Block: 450450033013006 21 Block: 450450033013007 37 Block: 450450033013008 80 Block: 450450033013009 44 Block: 450450033013010 53 Block: 450450033013011 0 Block: 450450033013012 71 Block: 450450033013013 90 Block: 450450033013014 256 Block: 450450033013015 22 Block: 450450033013016 94 Block: 450450033013017 62 Block: 450450033013018 38 Block: 450450033013019 13 Block: 450450033013020 19 Block: 450450033014000 0 Block: 450450033014001 508 Block: 450450033014002 43 Block: 450450033014003 18 Block: 450450033014004 19 Block: 450450033014005 50 Block: 450450033014006 18 Block: 450450033014007 0 Block: 450450033014008 23 Block: 450450033014009 23 Block: 450450033014010 9 Block: 450450033014011 9 Block: 450450033014012 211 Block: 450450033014013 3 Block: 450450033014014 12 Block: 450450033014015 13 Block: 450450033014016 9 Block: 450450033014017 68 Block: 450450033014018 15 Block: 450450033014019 88 Block: 450450033014020 10 Block: 450450033014021 23 Block: 450450033014022 16 Block: 450450033014023 17 Block: 450450033014024 12 Block: 450450033014025 0 Block: 450450033014026 45 Block: 450450033014027 12 Block: 450450033014028 24 Block: 450450033014029 0 Block: 450450033014030 10 Block: 450450033014031 0 Block: 450450035001017 0 Block: 450450035001036 3 Block: 450450035001037 14 Block: 450450035001041 72 Block: 450450035001042 38 Block: 450450035001043 0 Block: 450450035001044 0 VTD PIEDMONT Subtotal 3,595 VTD: POINSETT 4,944 VTD: RANCH CREEK 4,300 VTD: RIVERSIDE 4,074 VTD: RIVERWALK 3,213 VTD: ROCK HILL 3,984 VTD: ROCKY CREEK 3,075 VTD: ROLLING GREEN 2,152 VTD: ROYAL OAKS 2,245 VTD: SALUDA 2,296 VTD: SANDY FLAT 4,745 VTD: SEVIER 3,694 VTD: SILVERLEAF 2,967 VTD: SKYLAND 4,056 VTD: SLATER MARIETTA 5,430 VTD: SOUTHSIDE 3,356 VTD: SPARROWS POINT 3,721 VTD: SPRING FOREST 3,337 VTD: STANDING SPRINGS 2,507 VTD: STONE VALLEY 3,525 VTD: STONEHAVEN 2,677 VTD: SUBER MILL 5,075 VTD: SUGAR CREEK 2,958 VTD: SULPHUR SPRINGS 4,421 VTD: TANGLEWOOD 4,775 VTD: TAYLORS 3,650 VTD: THORNBLADE 5,118 VTD: TIGERVILLE 4,784 VTD: TIMBERLAKE 3,420 VTD: TRADE 4,337 VTD: TRAVELERS REST 1 3,695 VTD: TRAVELERS REST 2 2,619 VTD: TUBBS MOUNTAIN 3,582 VTD: TYGER RIVER 2,462 VTD: WADE HAMPTON 4,440 VTD: WALNUT SPRINGS 8,550 VTD: WELCOME 4,589 VTD: WELLINGTON 2,137 VTD: WESTCLIFFE 3,693 VTD: WESTSIDE 5,107 VTD: WOODMONT 4,225 VTD: WOODRUFF LAKES 3,493 County Greenville SC Subtotal 455,318 County: Pickens SC VTD: Arial Mill 1,893 VTD: Brushy Creek 2,398 VTD: Cedar Rock 1,798 VTD: Crescent Hill 1,896 VTD: Crestview 1,883 VTD: Crossroads 2,156 VTD: Crosswell 2,398 VTD: Dacusville 1,689 VTD: Easley 2,225 VTD: East Liberty 1,915 VTD: East Pickens 2,028 VTD: Flat Rock Block: 450770110031007 43 Block: 450770110031009 329 Block: 450770110031010 11 Block: 450770110032004 5 Block: 450770110032006 17 Block: 450770110032008 1 Block: 450770110032009 26 Block: 450770110032010 92 Block: 450770110032011 152 Block: 450770110032012 12 Block: 450770110032013 60 Block: 450770110032018 10 Block: 450770110032020 3 Block: 450770110032023 16 Block: 450770110032024 6 Block: 450770110032025 15 Block: 450770110032026 53 Block: 450770110032027 45 Block: 450770110052035 0 Block: 450770110052036 0 Block: 450770110052037 0 Block: 450770110052039 0 VTD Flat Rock Subtotal 896 VTD: Forest Acres 1,616 VTD: Fruit Mountain 1,600 VTD: Georges Creek 1,627 VTD: Glassy Mountain 2,090 VTD: Griffin 2,208 VTD: Holly Springs 1,971 VTD: Lenhardt 1,566 VTD: McAlister 1,770 VTD: McKissick 2,076 VTD: Nine Forks 1,909 VTD: North Liberty 1,871 VTD: North Pickens 2,094 VTD: Pendleton 1,768 VTD: Pickensville 1,866 VTD: Pope Field 1,539 VTD: Pumpkintown 2,141 VTD: Rock Springs 2,252 VTD: Saluda 2,241 VTD: Sheffield 1,655 VTD: Simpson 2,164 VTD: Sitton 1,814 VTD: Skelton 1,725 VTD: Smith Grove 1,611 VTD: South Pickens 2,147 VTD: Tri County 907 VTD: Vinland 1,591 VTD: Woodside 2,475 VTD: Zion 1,998 County Pickens SC Subtotal 75,467 County: Spartanburg SC VTD: Abner Creek Baptist 3,407 VTD: Anderson Mill Baptist 2,445 VTD: Anderson Mill Elementary 3,612 VTD: Apalache Baptist 4,795 VTD: Arcadia Elementary 3,246 VTD: Beaumont Methodist 1,445 VTD: Beech Springs Intermediate 3,386 VTD: Ben Avon Methodist 1,994 VTD: Bethany Baptist 3,284 VTD: Bethany Wesleyan 4,245 VTD: C.C. Woodson Recreation 2,374 VTD: Canaan 2,078 VTD: Cedar Grove Baptist 2,380 VTD: Chapman Elementary 3,126 VTD: Cleveland Elementary 4,464 VTD: Cornerstone Baptist 2,294 VTD: Croft Baptist 2,110 VTD: Cudd Memorial 2,556 VTD: D. R. Hill Middle School 4,636 VTD: Dayton Fire Station 2,893 VTD: Duncan United Methodist 2,665 VTD: E.P. Todd Elementary 3,928 VTD: Ebenezer Baptist 1,522 VTD: Fairforest Elementary 4,920 VTD: Fairforest Middle School 5,043 VTD: Greater St. James Block: 450830229023037 0 Block: 450830229023038 20 Block: 450830229023043 0 Block: 450830229023044 14 Block: 450830229023045 0 Block: 450830229023046 12 Block: 450830229023055 7 VTD Greater St. James Subtotal 53 VTD: Hayne Baptist 6,402 VTD: Hendrix Elementary 4,154 VTD: Holly Springs Baptist 5,562 VTD: Holy Communion 4,050 VTD: Hope 2,106 VTD: Jesse Bobo Elementary 3,037 VTD: Jesse Boyd Elementary 2,629 VTD: Landrum High School Block: 450830225002032 58 Block: 450830225003021 22 Block: 450830225003022 12 Block: 450830225003052 28 Block: 450830225003053 0 Block: 450830225003054 7 Block: 450830225003057 41 Block: 450830225003058 27 Block: 450830225003059 17 Block: 450830225003060 20 Block: 450830225003061 18 Block: 450830225003062 67 Block: 450830225003063 21 Block: 450830225003064 0 Block: 450830225003065 93 Block: 450830225003066 4 Block: 450830225003067 20 Block: 450830225003068 84 Block: 450830225003069 57 Block: 450830225003070 92 Block: 450830225003071 5 Block: 450830225003072 3 Block: 450830225003073 79 Block: 450830225003074 40 Block: 450830225003075 46 Block: 450830225003076 0 Block: 450830225003077 32 Block: 450830225003078 9 Block: 450830227011017 0 Block: 450830227011018 7 Block: 450830227011019 14 Block: 450830227011020 0 Block: 450830227011021 17 Block: 450830227011022 26 Block: 450830227011023 5 Block: 450830227011024 0 Block: 450830227011025 0 Block: 450830227011026 2 Block: 450830227011027 3 Block: 450830227011028 14 Block: 450830227011029 8 Block: 450830227011030 0 Block: 450830227011031 0 Block: 450830227011032 1 Block: 450830227011033 34 Block: 450830227011045 0 Block: 450830227011048 10 Block: 450830227011081 15 Block: 450830227011099 0 Block: 450830227011102 0 VTD Landrum High School Subtotal 1,058 VTD: Landrum United Methodist 4,488 VTD: Lyman Elementary 3,242 VTD: Lyman Town Hall 6,647 VTD: Motlow Creek Baptist 1,649 VTD: Mt. Moriah Baptist 2,596 VTD: Mt. Zion Gospel Baptist 1,353 VTD: Park Hills Elementary 2,594 VTD: Pelham Fire Station 3,298 VTD: Poplar Springs Fire Station 3,580 VTD: Powell Saxon Una 4,548 VTD: Reidville Elementary 4,379 VTD: Reidville Fire Station 5,659 VTD: River Ridge Elementary 4,456 VTD: Roebuck Bethlehem 2,334 VTD: Roebuck Elementary 4,420 VTD: Southside Baptist 2,023 VTD: Spartanburg High School 3,122 VTD: St. John's Lutheran 1,687 VTD: Startex Fire Station 1,804 VTD: Travelers Rest Baptist 5,948 VTD: Trinity Methodist 3,200 VTD: Trinity Presbyterian 2,749 VTD: Victor Mill Methodist 4,138 VTD: Wellford Fire Station 4,862 VTD: West View Elementary 2,420 VTD: Woodland Heights Recreation Center 3,347 VTD: Woodruff Fire Station 1,977 County Spartanburg SC Subtotal 200,419 District 4 Total 731,204 District 5 Area Population County: Cherokee SC 56,216 County: Chester SC 32,294 County: Fairfield SC 20,948 County: Lexington SC VTD: AMICKS FERRY 3,919 VTD: BUSH RIVER 2,120 VTD: CHALLEDON 2,449 VTD: CHAPIN 4,743 VTD: COLDSTREAM 2,431 VTD: DREHER ISLAND 2,160 VTD: DUTCHMAN SHORES 3,304 VTD: GARDENDALE 2,190 VTD: GRENADIER 2,905 VTD: IRMO 3,241 VTD: LINCREEK 3,141 VTD: MURRAYWOOD 2,684 VTD: OLD LEXINGTON 4,121 VTD: QUAIL VALLEY 2,730 VTD: SEVEN OAKS 2,488 VTD: ST. MICHAEL 2,685 VTD: WHITEHALL 2,750 VTD: WOODLAND HILLS 2,530 County Lexington SC Subtotal 52,591 County: Richland SC VTD: Ballentine 1 2,309 VTD: Ballentine 2 2,585 VTD: Beatty Road 2,018 VTD: Blythewood 1 2,980 VTD: Blythewood 3 3,818 VTD: College Place 2,288 VTD: Dennyside 1,696 VTD: Dentsville Block: 450790108031000 0 Block: 450790108031001 44 Block: 450790108031002 29 Block: 450790108031003 41 Block: 450790108031004 39 Block: 450790108031005 30 Block: 450790108031006 60 Block: 450790108031007 61 Block: 450790108031008 73 Block: 450790108031009 55 Block: 450790108031010 51 Block: 450790108031011 63 Block: 450790108031012 0 Block: 450790108031013 0 Block: 450790108031014 0 Block: 450790108031015 4 Block: 450790108031016 18 Block: 450790108031017 86 Block: 450790108032000 0 Block: 450790108032001 0 Block: 450790108032002 0 Block: 450790108032003 0 Block: 450790108032004 0 Block: 450790108032005 0 Block: 450790108032006 0 Block: 450790108032007 0 Block: 450790108032008 139 Block: 450790108032009 39 Block: 450790108032010 62 Block: 450790108032011 45 Block: 450790108032012 39 Block: 450790108032013 29 Block: 450790108032014 86 Block: 450790108032015 45 Block: 450790108032016 29 Block: 450790108032017 27 Block: 450790108032018 31 Block: 450790108032019 41 Block: 450790108032020 32 Block: 450790108032021 44 Block: 450790108033000 103 Block: 450790108033001 24 Block: 450790108033002 21 Block: 450790108033003 31 Block: 450790108033004 51 Block: 450790108033005 9 Block: 450790108033006 38 Block: 450790108033007 34 Block: 450790108033008 45 Block: 450790108033009 33 Block: 450790108033010 35 Block: 450790108033011 41 Block: 450790108033012 72 Block: 450790108033013 24 Block: 450790108033014 39 Block: 450790108033015 37 Block: 450790108033016 27 Block: 450790108033017 10 Block: 450790108033018 40 Block: 450790108033019 0 Block: 450790108041000 0 Block: 450790108041002 0 Block: 450790108041003 0 Block: 450790108041004 0 Block: 450790108041005 0 Block: 450790108041006 0 Block: 450790108041007 0 Block: 450790108041008 12 Block: 450790108041009 80 Block: 450790108041010 11 Block: 450790108041011 48 Block: 450790108041012 153 Block: 450790108041013 0 Block: 450790108041014 0 Block: 450790108041015 0 Block: 450790108041016 0 Block: 450790108041017 175 Block: 450790108041018 17 Block: 450790108041019 51 Block: 450790108041022 300 Block: 450790108041023 51 Block: 450790108041024 33 Block: 450790108041025 41 Block: 450790108041026 95 Block: 450790108041027 0 Block: 450790108041028 0 VTD Dentsville Subtotal 3,123 VTD: Dutch Fork 1 1,683 VTD: Dutch Fork 2 1,931 VTD: Dutch Fork 3 3,596 VTD: Dutch Fork 4 2,474 VTD: Fairlawn 4,466 VTD: Fairwold 1,046 VTD: Friarsgate 1 2,515 VTD: Friarsgate 2 2,064 VTD: Greenview 2,022 VTD: Harbison 1 3,481 VTD: Harbison 2 1,865 VTD: Keels 1 3,359 VTD: Keels 2 2,846 VTD: Killian 4,335 VTD: Kingswood 4,179 VTD: Lincolnshire 2,980 VTD: Longleaf 2,991 VTD: Meadowlake 3,678 VTD: Monticello 2,478 VTD: Oak Pointe 1 1,871 VTD: Oak Pointe 2 1,120 VTD: Oak Pointe 3 1,532 VTD: Old Friarsgate 2,035 VTD: Parkridge 1 1,534 VTD: Parkridge 2 1,784 VTD: Pine Grove 2,726 VTD: Rice Creek 1 2,404 VTD: Rice Creek 2 Block: 450790101073008 36 VTD Rice Creek 2 Subtotal 36 VTD: Riversprings 1 1,567 VTD: Riversprings 2 1,883 VTD: Riversprings 3 1,954 VTD: Riverwalk 3,706 VTD: Sandlapper 4,584 VTD: Spring Hill 3,572 VTD: Spring Valley West 4,099 VTD: Springville 1 2,866 VTD: Springville 2 2,620 VTD: Valley State Park 5,427 VTD: Walden 6,558 VTD: Ward 21 Block: 450790001001000 73 Block: 450790001001001 26 Block: 450790001001002 14 Block: 450790001001004 28 Block: 450790001001013 16 Block: 450790001001014 25 Block: 450790001001015 11 Block: 450790001001021 21 Block: 450790001002000 20 VTD Ward 21 Subtotal 234 VTD: Whitewell 3,325 County Richland SC Subtotal 132,243 County: Spartanburg SC VTD: Boiling Springs 9th Grade 6,645 VTD: Boiling Springs Elementary 7,524 VTD: Boiling Springs High School 2,556 VTD: Boiling Springs Intermediate 5,936 VTD: Boling Springs Jr. High 2,149 VTD: Broome High School 1,393 VTD: Cannons Elementary 1,766 VTD: Carlisle Fosters Grove 3,495 VTD: Carlisle Wesleyan 2,337 VTD: Cavins Hobbysville 1,496 VTD: Chapman High School 5,423 VTD: Cherokee Springs Fire Station 2,841 VTD: Chesnee Elementary 5,134 VTD: Converse Fire Station 1,963 VTD: Cooley Springs Baptist 4,474 VTD: Cowpens Depot Museum 1,970 VTD: Cowpens Fire Station 2,821 VTD: Cross Anchor Fire Station 1,219 VTD: Daniel Morgan Technology Center 1,608 VTD: Eastside Baptist 1,891 VTD: Enoree First Baptist 2,322 VTD: Gable Middle School 4,093 VTD: Glendale Fire Station 2,157 VTD: Gramling Methodist 2,501 VTD: Greater St. James Block: 450830228051000 248 Block: 450830228051001 275 Block: 450830228051002 11 Block: 450830228051003 49 Block: 450830228051004 34 Block: 450830228051007 16 Block: 450830229012010 5 Block: 450830229012011 20 Block: 450830229012012 13 Block: 450830229012013 24 Block: 450830229012014 20 Block: 450830229012015 18 Block: 450830229012016 4 Block: 450830229012017 14 Block: 450830229012018 5 Block: 450830229012019 13 Block: 450830229012020 21 Block: 450830229012021 0 Block: 450830229012022 0 Block: 450830229012023 0 Block: 450830229012024 7 Block: 450830229012025 6 Block: 450830229012026 4 Block: 450830229012027 10 Block: 450830229012028 13 Block: 450830229012029 5 Block: 450830229012030 107 Block: 450830229012031 6 Block: 450830229012032 10 Block: 450830229012033 1 Block: 450830229012034 20 Block: 450830229012035 9 Block: 450830229012036 24 Block: 450830229012037 5 Block: 450830229012038 16 Block: 450830229012039 4 Block: 450830229012040 10 Block: 450830229012041 16 Block: 450830229012042 10 Block: 450830229012043 2 Block: 450830229012044 0 Block: 450830229012045 0 Block: 450830229012046 0 Block: 450830229012047 30 Block: 450830229012048 5 Block: 450830229012049 6 Block: 450830229012050 13 Block: 450830229012051 7 Block: 450830229012052 13 Block: 450830229012053 0 Block: 450830229012054 0 Block: 450830229012055 0 Block: 450830229012056 0 Block: 450830229012057 5 Block: 450830229012058 21 Block: 450830229012063 0 Block: 450830229012069 15 Block: 450830229012070 21 Block: 450830229012071 23 Block: 450830229012072 0 Block: 450830229012073 0 Block: 450830229012074 11 Block: 450830229012075 0 Block: 450830229012076 0 Block: 450830229012077 0 Block: 450830229012080 0 Block: 450830229012081 0 Block: 450830229012082 0 Block: 450830229012083 0 Block: 450830229012084 0 Block: 450830229012085 0 Block: 450830229012086 0 Block: 450830229021005 0 Block: 450830229021006 0 Block: 450830229021007 7 Block: 450830229021008 11 Block: 450830229021009 6 Block: 450830229021010 19 Block: 450830229021011 22 Block: 450830229021012 22 Block: 450830229021013 7 Block: 450830229021014 23 Block: 450830229021015 55 Block: 450830229021016 13 Block: 450830229021017 4 Block: 450830229021018 5 Block: 450830229021019 0 Block: 450830229021020 16 Block: 450830229021021 10 Block: 450830229021022 0 Block: 450830229021023 4 Block: 450830229021024 11 Block: 450830229021025 329 Block: 450830229021026 6 Block: 450830229021027 2 Block: 450830229021028 5 Block: 450830229021029 49 Block: 450830229021030 41 Block: 450830229021031 6 Block: 450830229021032 0 Block: 450830229021033 0 Block: 450830229021034 84 Block: 450830229021035 0 Block: 450830229021036 13 Block: 450830229021037 14 Block: 450830229021038 45 Block: 450830229021039 9 Block: 450830229021040 4 Block: 450830229021041 0 Block: 450830229021042 26 Block: 450830229021043 0 Block: 450830229021044 407 Block: 450830229021045 41 Block: 450830229021046 12 Block: 450830229021047 0 Block: 450830229021048 6 Block: 450830229021049 14 Block: 450830229021050 30 Block: 450830229021051 220 Block: 450830229021052 0 Block: 450830229021053 2 Block: 450830229021054 6 Block: 450830229021055 10 Block: 450830229021056 8 Block: 450830229021057 15 Block: 450830229021058 7 Block: 450830229021059 64 Block: 450830229021060 0 Block: 450830229021061 13 Block: 450830229021062 0 Block: 450830229021063 5 Block: 450830229021064 6 Block: 450830229021068 26 Block: 450830229021069 10 Block: 450830229021071 41 Block: 450830229021072 14 Block: 450830229021074 6 Block: 450830229021075 4 Block: 450830229023000 9 Block: 450830229023001 0 Block: 450830229023002 7 Block: 450830229023003 4 Block: 450830229023004 42 Block: 450830229023005 0 Block: 450830229023006 5 Block: 450830229023007 24 Block: 450830229023008 32 Block: 450830229023009 39 Block: 450830229023010 14 Block: 450830229023011 21 Block: 450830229023012 13 Block: 450830229023013 7 Block: 450830229023014 15 Block: 450830229023015 182 Block: 450830229023016 0 Block: 450830229023017 0 Block: 450830229023018 0 Block: 450830229023019 19 Block: 450830229023020 0 Block: 450830229023021 0 Block: 450830229023022 30 Block: 450830229023023 0 Block: 450830229023024 0 Block: 450830229023025 29 Block: 450830229023026 0 Block: 450830229023027 29 Block: 450830229023028 10 Block: 450830229023029 32 Block: 450830229023030 0 Block: 450830229023031 23 Block: 450830229023032 34 Block: 450830229023033 6 Block: 450830229023034 24 Block: 450830229023035 49 Block: 450830229023036 0 Block: 450830229023039 8 Block: 450830229023040 19 Block: 450830229023041 58 Block: 450830229023042 0 Block: 450830229023047 28 Block: 450830229023048 9 Block: 450830229023049 13 Block: 450830229023050 9 Block: 450830229023051 9 Block: 450830229023052 7 Block: 450830229023053 10 Block: 450830229023054 0 Block: 450830229023056 5 Block: 450830229024020 16 Block: 450830229024021 7 Block: 450830229024022 90 Block: 450830229024024 0 Block: 450830229024025 7 Block: 450830229024031 0 Block: 450830229024032 11 Block: 450830229024033 37 Block: 450830229024034 16 Block: 450830229024035 35 Block: 450830229024036 56 Block: 450830229024037 12 Block: 450830229024041 28 Block: 450830229024042 24 Block: 450830229024043 46 Block: 450830229024044 18 Block: 450830229024045 58 Block: 450830229024047 6 Block: 450830229024049 0 Block: 450830229024050 0 Block: 450830229024051 0 VTD Greater St. James Subtotal 4,421 VTD: Lake Bowen Baptist 6,603 VTD: Landrum High School Block: 450830225001025 2 Block: 450830225001030 86 Block: 450830225001031 64 Block: 450830225001032 60 Block: 450830225001037 0 Block: 450830225001043 11 Block: 450830225001051 0 Block: 450830225001052 6 Block: 450830225001053 9 Block: 450830225001054 12 Block: 450830225001055 14 Block: 450830225001056 0 Block: 450830225001057 0 Block: 450830225001058 11 Block: 450830225001059 36 Block: 450830225001060 35 Block: 450830225001064 0 Block: 450830225001067 6 Block: 450830225001068 0 Block: 450830225001069 0 Block: 450830225001070 12 Block: 450830225001071 10 Block: 450830225001072 0 Block: 450830225001073 0 Block: 450830225001074 7 Block: 450830225001075 8 Block: 450830225001076 0 Block: 450830225001077 9 Block: 450830225001078 0 Block: 450830225001079 9 Block: 450830225001080 0 Block: 450830225001081 0 Block: 450830225001082 0 Block: 450830225001083 48 Block: 450830225001084 0 Block: 450830225001085 18 Block: 450830225001086 0 Block: 450830225001087 0 Block: 450830225001088 0 Block: 450830225001089 0 Block: 450830225001090 7 Block: 450830225001091 0 Block: 450830225001092 0 Block: 450830225001093 30 Block: 450830225001094 142 Block: 450830225001095 0 Block: 450830225001096 0 Block: 450830225001097 0 Block: 450830225001098 0 Block: 450830225001099 16 Block: 450830225001100 14 Block: 450830225001101 11 Block: 450830225001102 73 Block: 450830225001103 3 Block: 450830225001104 13 Block: 450830225001105 27 Block: 450830225001106 24 Block: 450830225001107 28 Block: 450830225001108 0 Block: 450830225001109 7 Block: 450830225001110 0 Block: 450830225001111 11 Block: 450830225001112 5 Block: 450830225001113 80 Block: 450830225001114 120 Block: 450830225001115 8 Block: 450830225001116 15 Block: 450830225001117 57 Block: 450830225001118 0 Block: 450830225001119 0 Block: 450830225001120 5 Block: 450830225002000 0 Block: 450830225002001 4 Block: 450830225002002 21 Block: 450830225002003 0 Block: 450830225002004 0 Block: 450830225002005 0 Block: 450830225002006 7 Block: 450830225002007 39 Block: 450830225002008 6 Block: 450830225002009 5 Block: 450830225002010 0 Block: 450830225002011 0 Block: 450830225002012 12 Block: 450830225002013 0 Block: 450830225002014 7 Block: 450830225002015 19 Block: 450830225002016 29 Block: 450830225002017 5 Block: 450830225002018 0 Block: 450830225002019 14 Block: 450830225002020 26 Block: 450830225002021 0 Block: 450830225002022 8 Block: 450830225002023 17 Block: 450830225002024 10 Block: 450830225002025 22 Block: 450830225002026 0 Block: 450830225002027 15 Block: 450830225002028 0 Block: 450830225002029 22 Block: 450830225002030 28 Block: 450830225002031 3 Block: 450830225002033 3 Block: 450830225002034 4 Block: 450830225002035 30 Block: 450830225002036 3 Block: 450830225002037 39 Block: 450830225002038 0 Block: 450830225002039 0 Block: 450830225002040 44 Block: 450830225002041 3 Block: 450830225002042 17 Block: 450830225002043 20 Block: 450830225002044 20 Block: 450830225002045 7 Block: 450830225002046 8 Block: 450830225002047 11 Block: 450830225002048 24 Block: 450830225002049 14 Block: 450830225002050 0 Block: 450830225002051 10 Block: 450830225002052 6 Block: 450830225002053 17 Block: 450830225002054 7 Block: 450830225002055 9 Block: 450830225002056 0 Block: 450830225002057 8 Block: 450830225002058 22 Block: 450830225002059 11 Block: 450830225002060 18 Block: 450830225002061 0 Block: 450830225002062 15 Block: 450830225002063 10 Block: 450830225002064 7 Block: 450830225002065 4 Block: 450830225002066 1 Block: 450830225002067 9 Block: 450830225002068 0 Block: 450830225002069 0 Block: 450830225002070 0 Block: 450830225002071 15 Block: 450830225002072 2 Block: 450830225002073 0 Block: 450830225003030 0 Block: 450830225003031 35 Block: 450830225003032 6 Block: 450830225003033 0 Block: 450830225003034 13 Block: 450830225003035 0 Block: 450830225003036 0 Block: 450830225003037 41 Block: 450830225003038 7 Block: 450830225003039 5 Block: 450830225003040 10 Block: 450830225003041 12 Block: 450830225003042 13 Block: 450830225003043 8 Block: 450830225003044 2 Block: 450830225003045 100 Block: 450830225003046 3 Block: 450830225003047 4 Block: 450830225003048 53 Block: 450830225003055 0 Block: 450830225003056 4 Block: 450830225003079 11 Block: 450830225003080 21 Block: 450830227011000 0 Block: 450830227011001 9 Block: 450830227011002 0 Block: 450830227011003 0 Block: 450830227011004 0 Block: 450830227011005 5 Block: 450830227011006 0 Block: 450830227011007 3 Block: 450830227011008 0 Block: 450830227011009 34 Block: 450830227011010 51 Block: 450830227011011 0 Block: 450830227011012 0 Block: 450830227011013 0 Block: 450830227011014 0 Block: 450830227011015 0 Block: 450830227011016 4 Block: 450830227011082 41 Block: 450830227011083 0 Block: 450830227011089 0 Block: 450830227011098 13 Block: 450830227011101 0 Block: 450830227022000 0 Block: 450830227022001 73 Block: 450830227022002 121 Block: 450830227022003 53 Block: 450830227022004 3 Block: 450830227022005 0 Block: 450830227022020 16 Block: 450830227022021 12 Block: 450830227022022 0 Block: 450830228031005 0 Block: 450830228031006 0 Block: 450830228031007 40 Block: 450830228031008 3 Block: 450830228031009 52 Block: 450830228031010 22 Block: 450830228031011 119 Block: 450830228031018 6 Block: 450830228031044 0 VTD Landrum High School Subtotal 2,934 VTD: Mayo Elementary 3,008 VTD: Morningside Baptist 2,639 VTD: Mt. Calvary Presbyterian 4,901 VTD: Oakland Elementary 3,205 VTD: Pacolet Elementary 3,545 VTD: Pauline Glenn Springs Elementary 1,635 VTD: R.D. Anderson Vocational 2,213 VTD: Swofford Career Center 5,388 VTD: White Stone Methodist 1,323 VTD: Whitlock Jr. High 2,894 VTD: Woodruff Elementary 4,799 VTD: Woodruff Leisure Center 2,356 County Spartanburg SC Subtotal 127,578 County: Union SC 27,244 County: York SC 282,090 District 5 Total 731,204 District 6 Area Population County: Charleston SC VTD: Charleston 1 795 VTD: Charleston 10 1,336 VTD: Charleston 11 2,040 VTD: Charleston 12 4,169 VTD: Charleston 13 1,457 VTD: Charleston 14 1,748 VTD: Charleston 15 2,793 VTD: Charleston 16 1,384 VTD: Charleston 17 1,307 VTD: Charleston 18 1,735 VTD: Charleston 19 986 VTD: Charleston 2 976 VTD: Charleston 20 1,576 VTD: Charleston 21 1,168 VTD: Charleston 3 1,062 VTD: Charleston 4 1,145 VTD: Charleston 5 1,053 VTD: Charleston 6 1,736 VTD: Charleston 7 2,498 VTD: Charleston 8 1,697 VTD: Charleston 9 1,389 VTD: Deer Park 1A 2,730 VTD: Deer Park 1B 7,708 VTD: Deer Park 2A 5,042 VTD: Deer Park 2B 3,280 VTD: Deer Park 2C 1,540 VTD: Deer Park 3 4,771 VTD: Ladson 5,160 VTD: Licolnville 3,471 VTD: North Charleston 1 1,110 VTD: North Charleston 10 2,970 VTD: North Charleston 11 1,055 VTD: North Charleston 12 1,379 VTD: North Charleston 13 1,662 VTD: North Charleston 14 931 VTD: North Charleston 15 2,365 VTD: North Charleston 16 1,555 VTD: North Charleston 17 1,526 VTD: North Charleston 18 3,448 VTD: North Charleston 19 1,843 VTD: North Charleston 2 1,789 VTD: North Charleston 20 1,280 VTD: North Charleston 21 2,704 VTD: North Charleston 22 2,642 VTD: North Charleston 23 3,360 VTD: North Charleston 24 5,435 VTD: North Charleston 25 1,018 VTD: North Charleston 26 922 VTD: North Charleston 27 3,061 VTD: North Charleston 28 3,038 VTD: North Charleston 29 2,738 VTD: North Charleston 3 1,594 VTD: North Charleston 30 2,995 VTD: North Charleston 4 1,807 VTD: North Charleston 5 2,709 VTD: North Charleston 6 2,048 VTD: North Charleston 7 2,354 VTD: North Charleston 8 1,267 VTD: North Charleston 9 2,754 VTD: St. Andrews 1 885 VTD: St. Andrews 10 1,484 VTD: St. Andrews 11 1,127 VTD: St. Andrews 12 1,305 VTD: St. Andrews 13 1,603 VTD: St. Andrews 14 1,977 VTD: St. Andrews 15 2,036 VTD: St. Andrews 16 1,233 VTD: St. Andrews 17 2,290 VTD: St. Andrews 18 2,724 VTD: St. Andrews 19 424 VTD: St. Andrews 2 1,393 VTD: St. Andrews 20 3,922 VTD: St. Andrews 21 1,385 VTD: St. Andrews 22 1,516 VTD: St. Andrews 23 1,491 VTD: St. Andrews 24 2,004 VTD: St. Andrews 25 2,305 VTD: St. Andrews 26 1,848 VTD: St. Andrews 27 6,553 VTD: St. Andrews 28 4,758 VTD: St. Andrews 29 5,106 VTD: St. Andrews 3 1,571 VTD: St. Andrews 30 2,771 VTD: St. Andrews 31 1,800 VTD: St. Andrews 32 1,476 VTD: St. Andrews 33 1,037 VTD: St. Andrews 34 3,060 VTD: St. Andrews 35 2,078 VTD: St. Andrews 36 2,058 VTD: St. Andrews 37 6,444 VTD: St. Andrews 4 1,993 VTD: St. Andrews 5 1,669 VTD: St. Andrews 6 1,432 VTD: St. Andrews 7 2,117 VTD: St. Andrews 8 1,100 VTD: St. Andrews 9 1,743 VTD: St. Pauls 1 1,103 VTD: St. Pauls 2A 1,261 VTD: St. Pauls 2B 1,786 VTD: St. Pauls 3 2,385 VTD: St. Pauls 4 2,400 VTD: St. Pauls 5 1,821 VTD: St. Pauls 6 2,907 County Charleston SC Subtotal 228,492 County: Chesterfield SC 43,273 County: Clarendon SC 31,144 County: Colleton SC VTD: Ashton-Lodge 734 VTD: Bells 464 VTD: Berea-Smoaks 1,245 VTD: Canady's 763 VTD: Cottageville 2,438 VTD: Edisto 466 VTD: Hendersonville 1,353 VTD: Horse Pen 1,050 VTD: Hudson Mill 734 VTD: Jacksonboro 457 VTD: Maple Cane 1,477 VTD: Mashawville 948 VTD: Peeples 2,134 VTD: Peniel 1,754 VTD: Petits 365 VTD: Rice Patch 847 VTD: Ritter 924 VTD: Round O 1,562 VTD: Ruffin 370 VTD: Sidneys 901 VTD: Sniders 978 VTD: Stokes 980 VTD: Walterboro No. 1 1,918 VTD: Walterboro No. 2 1,996 VTD: Walterboro No. 3 1,960 VTD: Walterboro No. 4 2,161 VTD: Walterboro No. 5 2,136 VTD: Walterboro No. 6 2,119 VTD: Williams 404 VTD: Wolfe Creek 608 County Colleton SC Subtotal 36,246 County: Dorchester SC VTD: Archdale 1,733 VTD: Archdale 2 2,115 VTD: Ashley River 3,361 VTD: Beech Hill 2 Block: 450350108012013 0 Block: 450350108012014 18 Block: 450350108012015 0 Block: 450350108012016 0 Block: 450350108012027 0 Block: 450350108012028 0 Block: 450350108012029 0 Block: 450350108014018 0 Block: 450350108014019 0 VTD Beech Hill 2 Subtotal 18 VTD: Cypress Block: 450350105011000 24 Block: 450350105011001 68 Block: 450350105011002 0 Block: 450350105011011 11 VTD Cypress Subtotal 103 VTD: Delemars Block: 450350108011017 0 Block: 450350108011018 0 Block: 450350108011019 0 Block: 450350108011020 0 Block: 450350108011021 0 Block: 450350108011022 0 Block: 450350108011023 0 Block: 450350108011024 0 Block: 450350108011025 0 Block: 450350108011026 0 Block: 450350108011027 0 Block: 450350108011028 0 Block: 450350108011029 0 Block: 450350108011030 0 Block: 450350108011031 23 Block: 450350108011032 66 Block: 450350108011033 0 Block: 450350108011034 0 Block: 450350108011035 87 Block: 450350108011036 9 Block: 450350108011037 52 Block: 450350108011038 0 Block: 450350108011039 96 Block: 450350108011040 13 Block: 450350108011041 22 Block: 450350108011042 102 Block: 450350108011043 0 Block: 450350108011044 27 Block: 450350108011045 31 Block: 450350108011046 0 Block: 450350108011047 0 Block: 450350108011048 0 Block: 450350108011049 0 Block: 450350108011050 0 Block: 450350108011051 0 Block: 450350108011052 0 Block: 450350108011053 0 Block: 450350108011054 0 Block: 450350108011055 15 Block: 450350108011062 16 Block: 450350108011063 0 Block: 450350108011064 0 Block: 450350108011065 0 Block: 450350108011066 0 Block: 450350108011067 0 Block: 450350108011068 0 Block: 450350108011069 42 Block: 450350108011070 0 Block: 450350108011071 0 Block: 450350108011072 14 Block: 450350108011073 0 Block: 450350108011074 0 Block: 450350108011075 0 Block: 450350108011076 0 Block: 450350108011077 0 Block: 450350108011078 0 Block: 450350108011079 32 Block: 450350108011080 0 Block: 450350108011081 0 Block: 450350108011082 18 Block: 450350108011083 10 Block: 450350108011084 0 Block: 450350108011085 0 Block: 450350108011086 0 Block: 450350108011087 0 Block: 450350108011095 0 Block: 450350108011096 0 VTD Delemars Subtotal 675 VTD: Four Hole 1,452 VTD: Givhans Block: 450350104003010 0 Block: 450350104003016 0 Block: 450350104003018 38 Block: 450350104003019 12 Block: 450350104003020 0 Block: 450350104003021 27 Block: 450350104003022 43 Block: 450350104003023 3 Block: 450350104003024 0 Block: 450350104003025 0 Block: 450350104003026 0 Block: 450350104003027 0 Block: 450350104003028 0 Block: 450350104003032 0 Block: 450350104003033 0 Block: 450350104003035 16 Block: 450350104003036 0 Block: 450350104003037 0 Block: 450350104003038 0 VTD Givhans Subtotal 139 VTD: Givhans 2 Block: 450350104004006 80 Block: 450350104004030 29 Block: 450350104004031 5 VTD Givhans 2 Subtotal 114 VTD: Grover 1,184 VTD: Harleyville 1,016 VTD: Indian Field 794 VTD: Indian Field 2 1,186 VTD: Lincoln Block: 450350108181032 558 Block: 450350108181033 0 Block: 450350108181034 0 Block: 450350108181035 61 Block: 450350108181036 74 Block: 450350108181037 0 Block: 450350108181045 0 Block: 450350108181046 18 Block: 450350108181047 0 Block: 450350108181048 0 Block: 450350108181049 0 Block: 450350108181050 0 Block: 450350108183004 539 Block: 450350108183005 0 Block: 450350108183006 108 Block: 450350108183007 35 Block: 450350108183008 19 Block: 450350108183009 12 Block: 450350108183010 29 Block: 450350108183011 45 Block: 450350108183012 0 Block: 450350108183013 233 Block: 450350108183014 41 Block: 450350108183015 45 Block: 450350108183016 164 Block: 450350108183017 30 Block: 450350108183018 31 Block: 450350108183020 22 Block: 450350108183021 0 Block: 450350108183022 0 Block: 450350108183023 0 Block: 450350108183027 0 Block: 450350108183028 0 Block: 450350108183029 0 Block: 450350108183030 21 Block: 450350108183031 362 Block: 450350108183032 318 Block: 450350108183033 172 Block: 450350108183034 141 Block: 450350108183035 86 Block: 450350108183036 0 Block: 450350108183037 0 Block: 450350108183038 0 Block: 450350108183039 0 Block: 450350108183040 0 Block: 450350108183041 0 Block: 450350108183042 0 Block: 450350108183043 0 Block: 450350108183044 0 Block: 450350108183045 0 Block: 450350108183046 0 Block: 450350108183047 0 Block: 450350108183048 149 Block: 450350108183049 49 VTD Lincoln Subtotal 3,362 VTD: Patriot 3,087 VTD: Reevesville 1,344 VTD: Ridgeville 1,268 VTD: Ridgeville 2 2,001 VTD: Rosinville 1,717 VTD: Rosses 1,375 VTD: Saul Dam 793 VTD: St. George No. 1 1,711 VTD: St. George No. 2 1,053 VTD: Windsor Block: 450350108171013 0 Block: 450350108182000 244 Block: 450350108182001 100 Block: 450350108182002 182 Block: 450350108182004 24 Block: 450350108182005 75 Block: 450350108182006 351 Block: 450350108182007 47 Block: 450350108182008 75 Block: 450350108182014 37 Block: 450350108182015 54 Block: 450350108184000 108 Block: 450350108184001 55 VTD Windsor Subtotal 1,352 VTD: Windsor 2 1,044 County Dorchester SC Subtotal 33,997 County: Kershaw SC 65,403 County: Lancaster SC 96,016 County: Lee SC VTD: Ashland/Stokes Bridge 695 VTD: Ashwood 896 VTD: Bishopville No. 1 2,118 VTD: Bishopville No. 2 970 VTD: Bishopville No. 3 958 VTD: Bishopville No. 4 1,595 VTD: Cedar Creek 373 VTD: Cypress 781 VTD: Elliott Block: 450619203021009 16 Block: 450619203021010 51 Block: 450619203021023 21 Block: 450619203021024 20 VTD Elliott Subtotal 108 VTD: Hickory Hill 478 VTD: Ionia 986 VTD: Manville 943 VTD: Mt. Clio Block: 450619203021000 45 Block: 450619203021001 20 Block: 450619203021002 0 Block: 450619203021003 0 Block: 450619203021004 7 Block: 450619203021005 0 Block: 450619203021006 79 Block: 450619203021007 34 Block: 450619203021011 2 Block: 450619203021012 3 Block: 450619203021013 22 Block: 450619203021015 3 Block: 450619203021022 0 Block: 450619203021057 0 Block: 450619203023045 0 Block: 450619203023046 0 Block: 450619203024041 0 Block: 450619203024042 0 Block: 450619203024043 0 Block: 450619203024044 19 Block: 450619203024045 1 Block: 450619203024046 7 Block: 450619203024048 0 Block: 450619203024050 0 Block: 450619203024051 0 Block: 450619203024052 3 Block: 450619203024056 6 VTD Mt. Clio Subtotal 251 VTD: Rattlesnake Springs 401 VTD: Schrocks Mill/Lucknow 628 VTD: Spring Hill 794 VTD: St. Charles 1,164 VTD: St. Matthews 235 VTD: Turkey Creek 221 VTD: Woodrow 297 County Lee SC Subtotal 14,892 County: Orangeburg SC VTD: Elloree 1 1,310 VTD: Elloree 2 950 VTD: Eutawville 1 1,861 VTD: Eutawville 2 2,519 VTD: Holly Hill 1 2,662 VTD: Holly Hill 2 2,468 VTD: Providence 1,372 VTD: Santee 1 1,844 VTD: Santee 2 1,507 VTD: Vance 1,904 County Orangeburg SC Subtotal 18,397 County: Richland SC VTD: Blythewood 2 3,379 VTD: Bookman 4,721 VTD: Bridge Creek 3,169 VTD: Estates 3,005 VTD: Kelly Mill 3,420 VTD: Lake Carolina 4,965 VTD: Longcreek 6,737 VTD: North Springs 1 Block: 450790114182000 669 Block: 450790114182001 46 Block: 450790114182002 138 Block: 450790114182003 118 Block: 450790114182004 49 Block: 450790114182005 186 Block: 450790114182006 40 Block: 450790114182007 304 Block: 450790114182012 78 Block: 450790114182013 77 VTD North Springs 1 Subtotal 1,705 VTD: Parkway 1 3,460 VTD: Parkway 2 3,503 VTD: Parkway 3 2,592 VTD: Pontiac 2 3,436 VTD: Rice Creek 2 Block: 450790101073000 416 Block: 450790101073002 222 Block: 450790101073003 63 Block: 450790101073004 47 Block: 450790101073005 48 Block: 450790101073006 137 Block: 450790101073007 25 Block: 450790101073009 32 Block: 450790101073010 881 Block: 450790101073011 51 Block: 450790101073012 42 Block: 450790101073013 36 Block: 450790101073014 0 Block: 450790101073015 152 Block: 450790101073016 0 Block: 450790101073018 44 Block: 450790101073019 60 Block: 450790101073020 50 Block: 450790101081002 64 Block: 450790101081007 223 Block: 450790101081008 58 Block: 450790101081010 298 Block: 450790101081011 47 Block: 450790101082000 377 Block: 450790101082001 64 Block: 450790101082002 59 Block: 450790101082003 317 Block: 450790101082004 55 Block: 450790101082005 32 Block: 450790101082006 253 VTD Rice Creek 2 Subtotal 4,153 VTD: Ridge View 1 3,895 VTD: Ridge View 2 4,697 VTD: Round Top 951 County Richland SC Subtotal 57,788 County: Sumter SC 105,556 District 6 Total 731,204 District 7 Area Population County: Darlington SC 62,905 County: Dillon SC 28,292 County: Florence SC 137,059 County: Georgetown SC 63,404 County: Horry SC 351,029 County: Lee SC VTD: Elliott Block: 450619203021016 2 Block: 450619203021017 41 Block: 450619203021018 8 Block: 450619203021019 0 Block: 450619203021020 9 Block: 450619203021021 0 Block: 450619203021025 84 Block: 450619203021026 29 Block: 450619203021027 23 Block: 450619203021028 37 Block: 450619203021029 6 Block: 450619203021030 5 Block: 450619203021031 18 Block: 450619203021032 4 Block: 450619203021033 0 Block: 450619203021034 22 Block: 450619203021035 25 Block: 450619203021036 0 Block: 450619203021037 8 Block: 450619203021038 19 Block: 450619203021039 11 Block: 450619203021040 1 Block: 450619203021041 0 Block: 450619203021042 0 Block: 450619203021043 0 Block: 450619203021044 0 Block: 450619203021045 0 Block: 450619203021046 0 Block: 450619203021047 2 Block: 450619203021051 6 Block: 450619203021052 0 Block: 450619203021059 7 Block: 450619206001007 12 Block: 450619206001008 2 Block: 450619206001009 1 Block: 450619206001010 6 Block: 450619206001011 0 Block: 450619206001012 30 VTD Elliott Subtotal 418 VTD: Lynchburg 758 VTD: Mt. Clio Block: 450619203021014 5 VTD Mt. Clio Subtotal 5 VTD: South Lynchburg 458 County Lee SC Subtotal 1,639 County: Marion SC 29,183 County: Marlboro SC 26,667 County: Williamsburg SC 31,026 District 7 Total 731,204 State Totals 5,118,425 SECTION 2.  Section 7-19-45 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 3.  (A)(1) The President of the Senate has an unconditional right to intervene on behalf of the Senate in a state court action and may provide evidence or argument, written or oral, if a party to that court action challenges the constitutionality of this act, the validity of this legislation, or any action of the General Assembly. (2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives has an unconditional right to intervene on behalf of the House of Representatives in a state court action and may provide evidence or argument, written or oral, if a party to that court action challenges the constitutionality of this act, the validity of this legislation, or any action of the General Assembly. (B)(1) In a federal court action that challenges the constitutionality of this act, the validity of this legislation, or any action of the General Assembly, the President of the Senate has standing to intervene as a party on behalf of the Senate, to file an amicus brief, or to provide evidence or argument, written or oral, in accordance with the federal rules of procedure, irrespective of whether any other officer of the State has appeared in the action. A federal court presiding over any action in which the State of South Carolina, or any state agency, is a named party is requested to allow the President, on behalf of the Senate, to participate in any such action as a party. (2) In a federal court action that challenges the constitutionality of this act, the validity of this legislation, or any action of the General Assembly, the Speaker of the House of Representatives has standing to intervene as a party on behalf of the House of Representatives, to file an amicus brief, or to provide evidence or argument, written or oral, in accordance with the federal rules of procedure, irrespective of whether any other officer of the State has appeared in the action. A federal court presiding over any action in which the State of South Carolina, or any state agency, is a named party is requested to allow the Speaker, on behalf of the House of Representatives, to participate in any such action as a party. (C)(1) A request to intervene or the participation of the President of the Senate as a party or otherwise, in any action challenging the constitutionality of a state statute, the validity of legislation, or any action of the General Assembly does not constitute a waiver of: (a) legislative immunity or legislative privilege for any individual legislator, legislative officer, or legislative staff member; or (b) sovereign immunity or any other rights, privileges, or immunities of the State that arise under the United States Constitution or the South Carolina Constitution. (2) A request to intervene or the participation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives as a party or otherwise, in any action challenging the constitutionality of a state statute, the validity of legislation, or any action of the General Assembly does not constitute a waiver of: (a) legislative immunity or legislative privilege for any individual legislator, legislative officer, or legislative staff member; or (b) sovereign immunity or any other rights, privileges, or immunities of the State that arise under the United States Constitution or the South Carolina Constitution. (D) The State Election Commission and the Attorney General must notify the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives within twenty-four hours of the receipt of service of a complaint that challenges the validity of this act. (E) In any action in which the Senate or the House of Representatives intervenes or participates pursuant to this section, the Senate and the House of Representatives must function independently from each other in the representation of their respective bodies, unless otherwise agreed to by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. (F)(1) The Senate is hereby authorized and empowered to employ attorneys other than the Attorney General to defend any law enacted creating legislative or congressional districts. (2) The House of Representatives is hereby authorized and empowered to employ attorneys other than the Attorney General to defend any law enacted creating legislative or congressional districts. SECTION 4.  The President of the Senate is authorized to initiate or otherwise participate in litigation on behalf of the Senate regarding redistricting. SECTION 5.  The Speaker of the House is authorized to initiate or otherwise participate in litigation on behalf of the House of Representatives regarding redistricting as the Chief Administrative Officer of the House of Representatives pursuant to Section 2-3-110. SECTION 6.  Any person elected or appointed to serve, or serving, as a member of any board, commission, or committee to represent a congressional district, whose residency is transferred to another district by a change in the composition of the district, may serve, or continue to serve, the term of office for which he was elected or appointed; however, the appointing or electing authority shall appoint or elect an additional member on that board, commission, or committee from the district which loses a resident member as a result of the transfer to serve until the term of the transferred member expires.  When a vacancy occurs in the district to which a member has been transferred, the vacancy must not be filled until the full term of the transferred member expires. SECTION 7.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----